Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.020

Common schools.

"Common schools" means schools maintained at public expense in each school district and carrying on a program from kindergarten through the twelfth grade or any part thereof including vocational educational courses otherwise permitted by law.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.060. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 261 s 1, part; RRS s 4680, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 64, part; 1890 p 371 s 44, part. Formerly RCW 28A.01.060, 28.58.190, part, 28.01.060.]